Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 1. Salaries and Expenses

§ 9-3-101.
Salaries; amount; date of payment.

Salaries for clerk of the supreme court and district court reporters shall be determined by the supreme court as authorized by legislative appropriations. Subject to constitutional limitations the following state officers and members of the judiciary shall receive the salaries indicated by the figures following their respective titles:

Governor $140,000.00;

Secretary of state $125,000.00;

State auditor $125,000.00;

State treasurer $125,000.00;

Superintendent of public instruction $125,000.00.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 96, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1988, ch. 96, § 3.

When a state officer is required to simultaneously serve in his office as a temporary or acting replacement for another officer, he shall receive only the salary of the office he holds.

Except as otherwise provided by law, other state employees and officers, including members of boards and commissions, shall receive salaries in amounts as provided by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(iv) and

27-5-101

.

Except for employees paid hourly, or by hard copy payroll check, as determined by the state auditor’s office, overtime and shift differential pay and employees and officers of the University of Wyoming, state employees and officers on automatic payroll direct deposit shall be paid on the last working day of the month for wages earned during that month. Hourly pay shall be paid to state employees on automatic payroll direct deposit on the last working day of the month for wages earned from the sixteenth day of the preceding month through the fifteenth day of the current month. Overtime and shift differential pay shall be paid to state employees on automatic payroll direct deposit no later than the last working day of the month following the month in which overtime and shift differential pay was earned. Employees and officers paid by hard copy payroll check shall have their payroll check mailed and post marked not later than the last working day of the month. The University of Wyoming is exempt from this subsection.

The state auditor and payroll officers for employees of the department of transportation, the University of Wyoming and community colleges may establish payroll check-off programs for state employees under which payments to third-parties are made directly from deductions from state employee payroll payments for supplemental medical plans, disability plans, life insurance plans and annuities. The state auditor and other payroll officers authorized to establish a payroll check-off program may impose an initial fee of up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) for each deduction filed upon a third-party for which check-off payments are established and thereafter, may impose an annual fee of two dollars ($2.00) per enrolled employee. The state auditor and other payroll officers authorized to establish a payroll check-off program may establish rules and regulations to implement the program.

Notwithstanding the time limits required by W.S. 27-4-104(a), upon termination of employment, a state employee or officer shall be paid all wages and salaries due for work performed prior to termination on or before the next regular day upon which he would have received the pay if still employed.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 18, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 182; C.S. 1910, § 264; C.S. 1920, § 304; R.S. 1931, § 109-1414; C.S. 1945, § 20-202; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-3.2, 9-12; Laws 1969, ch. 168, § 39; 1971, ch. 190, § 1; 1973, ch. 162, § 1; 1975, ch. 138, § 1; 1977, ch. 7, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-105, 9-1-114; Laws 1978, ch. 39, § 1; 1980, ch. 35, § 1; 1981, ch. 113, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 96, §§ 2, 3; 1989, ch. 98, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; ch. 244, § 1; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 1993, ch. 170, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2001, ch. 154, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 94, § 1; 2003, ch. 81, § 1; 2013 ch. 139, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 111, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to withholding salary of public officers in case of embezzlement of public funds or failure to pay over fees, see §

9-4-104

.

As to prohibition against extra compensation, see art. 3, § 30, Wyo. Const.

As to prohibition against changing terms and salaries of public officers, with certain exceptions, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

For general constitutional provisions on salaries and fees, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (f).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “$140,000.00” for “$105,000.00” in (a)(i); and substituted “$125,000.00” for “$92,000.00” in (a)(ii) through (a)(v).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 111, § 2, provides, “(a) The amended salaries provided for in section 1 of this act shall begin upon the swearing into office of the elected official following the 2022 general election. Until that time the following annual salary schedule shall apply:

“(i) Governor
$105,000.00;

“(ii) Secretary of state
$92,000.00;

“(iii) State auditor
$92,000.00;

“(iv) State treasurer
$92,000.00;

“(v) Superintendent of public instruction
$92,000.00.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 18, Laws 1895, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

§ 9-3-102.
Meal allowance; actual expenses; exceptions.

Unless otherwise provided by law, when any state officer or employee is required to travel on overnight trips for official business of the state, he is entitled to receive in addition to transportation expenses as provided by W.S.

9-3-103

, lodging expenses, an allowance for meals and incidental expenses and other reimbursable expenses. The lodging and meal and incidental expense allowance shall be as determined by the governor for the state and by the governing body of any other entity using the state rate for that entity, but shall not exceed the published federal travel regulation rates in effect at the time of travel. The meal and incidental expense allowance shall be computed so as to pay seventy-five percent (75%) of the destination rate on the day of departure, one hundred percent (100%) on all interim days of official travel and seventy-five percent (75%) of the previous day’s rate on the day of return. Lodging expenses shall be reimbursed up to the amount prescribed in the federal travel regulation as provided in this subsection. The head of the respective agency may approve lodging expenses in excess of the published rate. In addition:

Meal expenses, either directly billed to the state, or included in registration, seminar and conference fees paid by the state on behalf of the state officer or employee are considered part of the meal and incidental expense allowance and shall be deducted from the allowance claim of the state officer or employee;

The head of the agency to be charged for the expense, or his designee, shall approve the claim for payment. State officers or employees shall not approve their own claims. The head of the agency is responsible to determine the veracity of each claim;

Any reimbursable expenses claimed in excess of fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be supported by original vendor receipts or a sworn statement attesting to the expense, signed under penalty of false swearing by the claimant, and shall be attached to the voucher submitted to the state auditor for payment.

Instead of the full meal and incidental expense allowance specified in subsection (a) of this section, the state officer or employee will be reimbursed for actual expenses for meals and gratuities while conducting official business of the state, not to exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the daily meal and incidental expense allowance for the location of the official business if the officer or employee:

Is required to travel on a one (1) day trip of twenty-four (24) hours or less during which it is reasonable to assume no sleep or rest is required; or

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 101, § 2.

Is required to eat a meal at an official meeting of a state committee, commission, board or council held in the community of the state officer’s or employee’s official domicile.

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 102, § 2.

Actual expenses in excess of the amounts specified in subsection (a) of this section may be reimbursed for in-state or out-of-state travel, with the prior approval of the agency director if:

Specific prior trip approval has been given by the head of the respective agency if the agency is within the executive branch, the management council for the legislative branch and the chief justice of the supreme court for the judicial branch; and

The original itemized vendor receipts supporting amounts claimed for lodging and employee meals and gratuities where the total amount of the meal and gratuity exceeds fifteen dollars ($15.00), accompany the claim submitted to the state auditor for payment. No reimbursement shall be claimed or paid for any alcoholic beverage.

Claims for lodging and meal and incidental expense allowance or actual expense reimbursement shall be submitted to the state auditor for payment in the manner and form prescribed by him.

This section does not apply to the state transportation and game and fish departments.

Any voucher for reimbursement under this section or W.S.

9-3-103

shall be signed and certified under penalty of false swearing pursuant to W.S.

6-5-303

.

As used in the section:

“Destination” means the location of the employee at midnight, or if still traveling at midnight, the location where lodging is secured;

“Incidental expense” means fees and tips given to porters, baggage carriers, bellhops, hotel maids, stewards or stewardesses and others on ships and hotel servants in foreign countries;

“Meal” means expenses for breakfast, lunch, dinner and related tips and taxes, but does not include expenses incurred for alcoholic beverages, entertainment or any expenses incurred for other persons;

“Reimbursable expenses” means other expenses that are inherently travel related and not included in the meal and incidental expense allowance.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess. ch. 12, §§ 1, 2; 1943, ch. 87, § 1; 1945, ch. 134, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 20-203, 20-204; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 14, § 1; 1947, ch. 89, § 1; 1951, ch. 54, § 1; 1953, ch. 94, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-13, 9-14; Laws 1959, ch. 199, § 1; 1963, ch. 165, § 1; 1967, ch. 233, § 1; 1971, ch. 16, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 160, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-115, 9-1-116; Laws 1979, ch. 131, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 130, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 63, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 102, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 17, § 1; 1991, ch. 134, § 1; 1992, ch. 41, § 1; 2001, ch. 101, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 140, § 1; 2006, ch. 17, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general constitutional provisions on salaries and fees, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

As to reimbursement of county officers for traveling expenses, see §

18-3-110

.

As to compensation of county commissioners, see §

18-3-503

.

As to compensation and expenses of game and fish commissioners, see §

23-1-203

.

As to compensation of state highway commissioners, see §

24-2-101

.

As to management council for legislative branch, see §

28-8-102

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective April 1, 2005, in (a), inserted “but shall not exceed” and substituted “2005” for “2001” in the second sentence, added the third sentence, and substituted “previous day's rate” for “destination rate” in the fourth sentence.

The 2006 amendment,

effective April 1, 2006, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “shall be as determined by the governor for the state and by the governing body of any other entity using the state rate for that entity” for “shall be based on” and “at the time of travel” for “on April 1, 2005,” deleted the third sentence regarding the submission of a report of current federal travel rates as of November 1 of each year, and made related changes throughout.

Per diem irrelevant to worker's compensation coverage. —

That a state employee received a per diem for travel expenses was irrelevant to the issue of whether that employee was “traveling by vehicle,” pursuant to § 27-14-103(c) (now repealed), so as to be covered by worker's compensation. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. v. Mahoney, 798 P.2d 836,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1990) (decided under prior law).

Cited

in

Sell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Sell), 7 P.3d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 9-3-103.
Transportation expenses; limitation on longevity or length-of-service allowances.

Any state, county or precinct officer or employee required to travel in the performance of the duties of his office is entitled to receive reimbursement for all actual and necessary transportation expenses incurred as provided by one (1) of the following methods:

If common carrier transportation is used, the actual expense not to exceed economy fare charged the general public is reimbursable. If deluxe accommodations are desired, the amount exceeding economy fare shall be paid personally by the officer or employee. Passenger coupons issued by the transportation company or an official fare receipt shall accompany the claim submitted to the state auditor or the board of county commissioners for audit and payment. With prior approval of the respective executive agency head, the management council or the chief justice of the supreme court, actual expenses in excess of the economy fare may be reimbursed;

If rented, chartered or contracted vehicle transportation is used, reimbursement is limited to reasonable rates determined by the administrative head of the governmental unit where claim is submitted. The vendor’s official receipt for charges shall accompany the claim submitted to the state auditor or board of county commissioners for audit and payment;

If private vehicle transportation is used, reimbursement shall be as determined by the governor for the state and by the governing body of any other entity, based on a mileage allowance not to exceed the maximum nontaxable rates allowed by the internal revenue service at the time of travel.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 23, § 2.

At the discretion of the administrative head of the governmental unit in which claim is submitted, reimbursement may be authorized for actual but necessary vehicle parking fees, car wash expenses, toll fees, taxi fares and taxi driver tips.

Before any claim for transportation expenses is paid, the claimant shall present to the state auditor or the board of county commissioners for audit and payment a verified claim made out in separate items properly dated. The value of each item shall be specifically described to the satisfaction of the auditing officer or board to indicate that the expense has been properly incurred for the benefit of the state or county in pursuance of the claimant’s official duties.

County commissioners shall at all times receive transportation expense reimbursement when engaged upon official county business. Other officers of the county shall receive transportation expense reimbursement subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners.

No state official or employee shall receive transportation expense reimbursement when traveling from his residence to the place of his employment and return.

A state officer, judge or employee whose salary is fixed by W.S.

9-3-101

or by any other specific act of the legislature shall not receive any additional allowance based on longevity or length of service, or any other compensation, perquisite or allowances whatever except per diem and necessary traveling and moving expenses when otherwise authorized by law. If any officer, judge or employee, or any retired officer, judge or employee, is receiving compensation or retirement benefits on the effective date of this act which include an additional allowance for longevity or length of service previously authorized, those compensation or retirement benefits shall not be immediately reduced or diminished, but that portion of the compensation or retirement benefits being received on the effective date of this act which is attributable to longevity or length of service allowance shall be reduced or disallowed to the extent it is offset by future increases in salary or retirement benefits authorized by act of the legislature. This subsection does not apply to retirement, health insurance or life insurance benefits, but only to compensation received for length of service.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, § 1226; Laws 1905, ch. 76, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1138; C.S. 1920, § 1374; R.S. 1931, § 30-114; Laws 1933, ch. 66, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-208; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 31; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-11, 9-16; Laws 1959, ch. 199, § 2; 1961, ch. 62, § 1; 1963, ch. 2, § 1; 1971, ch. 14, § 1; 1975, ch. 141, § 1; 1977, ch. 160, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-113, 9-1-118; Laws 1978, ch. 43, § 1; 1979, ch. 4, § 1; ch. 129, § 1; 1981, ch. 129, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1988, ch. 16, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 17, § 1; 1996, ch. 1, § 311; 1998, ch. 30, § 313; 1999, ch. 187, § 1; 2000, ch. 91, § 1; 2001, ch. 23, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against changing terms and salaries of public officers, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

For general constitutional provisions on salaries and fees, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

As to computation of mileage with reference to members of the legislature, see §

28-5-102

.

As to management council for legislative branch, see §

28-8-102

.

Editor's notes. —

The term “this act,” referred to twice in the second sentence in subsection (f), seemingly refers to Laws 1982, ch. 62. Section 5, ch. 62, Laws 1982, makes the act effective on January 1, 1983.

Legislative intent must be given effect. —

The fact that the law might make administration difficult on account of the requirement of reimbursement for actual expenses only, and the fact that inconvenience is imposed on those affected, afford no legal reason for adding to or deleting from this section words or phraseology in order to make the law over into a form the court might think would be best for all concerned. State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1937).

If proof cannot accurately or at all be made of some items of expense which the owner of an automobile employed in state business might think proper to claim, the court cannot say that the legislature did not consider such a possibility and, by enacting the law in the language used, place the stamp of its disapproval upon items of this character. State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1937).

Governor cannot fix reimbursement rate. —

The legislature is the only authority authorized to change the rate fixed by statute, and the attempt of the governor to fix a flat rate per mile is of no force or effect. State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1937).

Amount allowed for expenses may be constitutionally changedduring officer's term. —

Statutory compensation for expenses necessarily incurred in performing the duties of an office is neither salary nor emolument, and amount allowed by law for such expenses may be changed during the officer's term, without doing violence to the constitutional provision. Taxpayers' League of Carbon County v. McPherson, 49 Wyo. 251, 54 P.2d 897,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1936).

Auditor has right to exact reasonable and due legal proof,

in order that he may determine the actual expense of the officer making the claim. State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1937).

And itemized statement required. —

Where an officer uses his own automobile, it is necessary for him to file an itemized statement of his actual expenses, and such as cannot be itemized cannot be collected. State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1937).

§ 9-3-104.
Moving expenses.

When any state officer or employee is transferred from one (1) official station to another within the state of Wyoming for permanent duty, when the transfer is made at the request of and for the benefit of the state of Wyoming, the employing agency shall pay the actual expenses of transporting the household goods and effects of the officer or employee.

The governor may expend up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) in any term of office, from any appropriation to the governor’s office not otherwise specifically restricted, for purposes of defraying moving expenses for gubernatorial appointees who are required to move to Cheyenne. Not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) shall be expended for any one (1) appointee. Any funds expended for this purpose shall be reimbursed to the state by the appointee if the appointee is employed by the state for less than twelve (12) months.

If there is a change in governor as a result of a general election, the governor may expend up to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000.00) from any appropriation to the governor’s office not otherwise specifically restricted, for transition staff salaries, travel and other related office expenses. If there is a change of any other elected state official as a result of a general election, the elected official may expend up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000.00) from any appropriation to the official’s office not otherwise specifically restricted, for the same purposes.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 9-11; Laws 1963, ch. 2, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-1-113; Laws 1978, ch. 43, § 1; 1979, ch. 4, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 2009, ch. 129, § 1.

Cross references. —

For general constitutional provisions on salaries and fees, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing provisions as (a) and added (b) and (c).

§ 9-3-105.
Reduction in force; defined; maintenance of medical benefits.

As used in this section, “reduction in force” means the involuntary separation of any employee from state employment because of a shortfall of funding, lack of work or organizational changes requiring a reduction in the number of positions of state employment.

The state’s share of the health insurance benefits under the group insurance plan for state employees shall be maintained by the state for any state employee separated from employment because of a reduction in force for a period of six (6) months following separation or until the separated employee acquires employment, whichever first occurs.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 55, § 1.

§ 9-3-106.
Interbranch donation of sick leave.

An employee of an entity participating in the state health insurance program may donate accrued sick leave to an employee of another entity participating in the state health insurance program if authorized by reciprocal personnel policies adopted by the appropriate entities.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to accruing sick leave during military service, see §

19-11-107

. As to reimbursement of payments for sick leave upon being rehired, see § 9-2-1022(e).

Effective date. —

Laws 2006, ch. 28, § 2, makes the section effective July 1, 2006.